District of Columbia statutes.
4-714

Repealed

Housing goals; priorities.

Repealed.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-146, § 9
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 2(i), 37 DCR 4815
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(b), 52 DCR 8113
1981 Ed., § 3-614.